Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.161

Consent and proxies of partners.

Action requiring the consent of partners under this chapter may be taken without a meeting, and a partner may appoint a proxy to consent or otherwise act for the partner by signing an appointment record, either personally or by the partner's attorney-in-fact.

[ 2009 c 188 s 118.]